North Carolina, session 2025, HB134.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 106-549.15 reads as rewritten:
"§ 106-549.15. Definitions.
As used in this Article, except as otherwise specified, the following terms shall have the
meanings stated below:
…
(1a) "Agricultural food animal" means a domesticated animal belonging to the
bovine, caprine, ovine, or porcine species.
…
(5a) "Cell-cultured food product" means a food product having one or more
sensory attributes that resemble a type of tissue originating from an
agricultural food animal but that, in lieu of being derived from meat
processing, is derived from manufacturing cells, in which one or more stem
cells are initially isolated from an agricultural food animal, are grown in vitro,
and may be manipulated, as part of a manufacturing operation.
(5b) "Close proximity" means any of the following:
a. Immediately before or after the name of the product.
b. In the line of the label immediately before or after the line containing
the name of the product.
c. Within the same phrase or sentence containing the name of the
product.
…
(9a) "Identifying meat term" means any word or phrase that states, indicates,
suggests, or describes a meat product, regardless of whether the word or
phrase is used individually, as a portmanteau, or as a compound word. This
term includes all of the following:
a. A common name for the species of the agricultural food animal subject
to slaughter and processing, including a calf or cow, goat or kid, hog
or pig, lamb, or sheep.
*H134-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
b. A common name for a characteristic of a species of the agricultural
food animal subject to slaughter and processing based on age, breed,
or sex.
c. Meat; beef or veal; cabrito or chevon; lamb or mutton; or pork.
d. A common name used to describe a major cut of a meat of an
agricultural food animal slaughtered and processed, including a major
meat cut specified in 9 C.F.R. § 317.344, or the common name of an
organ or offal, including heart, liver, kidney, or tongue.
e. Any other common name that a reasonable purchaser would
immediately and exclusively associate with a meat product prepared
for sale in normal commercial channels such as bacon, baloney,
bologna, bone, brat or bratwurst, brisket, burger or hamburger, butt,
chop, chuck, cold cut, cutlet, filet, flat iron, frank or frankfurter, ham,
hock, hot dog, jerky, liverwurst, loin, London broil, lunch meat, New
York strip, pepperoni, porterhouse, ribeye, roast, rib or sparerib,
salami, sausage, shank, sirloin, tenderloin, or a comparable word or
phrase.
(9b) "Insect-protein food product" means a food product having one or more
sensory attributes that resemble a type of tissue originating from an
agricultural food animal but that, in lieu of being derived from meat
processing, is derived from manufacturing insect parts.
…
(12a) "Manufactured-protein food product" means a cell-cultured food product,
insect-protein food product, or plant-protein food product.
…
(14) "Meat food product" means any product capable of use as human food that is
made wholly or in part from any meat or other portion of the carcass of any
cattle, sheep, swine, goats, bison, fallow deer, or red deer, or any cell-cultured
food product made from cells of those animals, excepting products that
contain meat or other portions of such carcasses only in a relatively small
proportion or historically have not been considered by consumers as products
of the meat food industry, and that are exempted from definition as a meat
food product by the Board under such conditions as it may prescribe to assure
that the meat or other portions of such carcasses contained in such product are
not adulterated and that such products are not represented as meat food
products. This term as applied to food products of equines shall have a
meaning comparable to that provided in this subdivision with respect to cattle,
sheep, swine, goats, and bison.
(15) "Misbranded" shall apply to any carcass, part thereof, meat or meat food
product under one or more of the following circumstances:
a. If its labeling is false or misleading in any particular;
b. If it is offered for sale under the name of another food;
c. If it is imitation of another food, unless its label bears, in type of
uniform size and prominence, the word "imitation" and immediately
thereafter, the name of the food imitated;
…
m. The product is a cell-cultured food product and it is not labeled in
accordance with G.S. 106-549.28A.
…
(20a) "Plant-protein food product" means a food product having one or more
sensory attributes that resemble a type of tissue originating from an
Page 2 House Bill 134-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
agricultural food animal but that, in lieu of being derived from meat
processing, is derived from manufacturing plant or fungus parts.
…
(21a) "Qualifying term" means a word, compound word, or phrase that would
clearly disclose to a reasonable purchaser of meat products that a food product
is not a meat product. This includes the following terms: "cell-cultured,"
"fake," "grown in a lab," "insect," "insect-based," "insect-protein,"
"lab-created," "lab-grown," "meat free," "meatless," "plant," "plant-based,"
"vegan," "vegetable," "vegetarian," or "veggie."
(21b) "Ratite" means a bird whose breastbone is smooth so that flight muscles
cannot attach, such as an ostrich, an emu, and a rhea. These birds are subject
to the provisions of this Article and Article 49C to the same extent as any other
meat food product.
…."
SECTION 1.(b) Article 49B of Chapter 106 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 106-549.28A. Labeling of manufactured-protein food products.
(a) The label of any manufactured-protein food product that contains an identifying meat
term shall also contain in at least 20-point font or the size of the surrounding type, whichever is
greater, and in close proximity to the name of the product, an appropriate qualifying term.
(b) A manufactured-protein food product that does not meet the requirements of this
section shall be deemed misbranded for purposes of this Article."
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 106-549.51 reads as rewritten:
"§ 106-549.51. Definitions.
For purposes of this Article, the following terms shall have the meanings stated below:
…
(4a) "Cell-cultured food product" means a food product having one or more
sensory attributes that resemble a type of tissue originating from poultry but
that, in lieu of being derived from meat processing, is derived from
manufacturing cells, in which one or more stem cells are initially isolated from
poultry, are grown in vitro, and may be manipulated, as part of a
manufacturing operation.
(4b) "Close proximity" means any of the following:
a. Immediately before or after the name of the product.
b. In the line of the label immediately before or after the line containing
the name of the product.
c. Within the same phrase or sentence containing the name of the
product.
…
(10a) "Identifying poultry term" means any word or phrase that states, indicates,
suggests, or describes a poultry product, regardless of whether the word or
phrase is used individually, as a portmanteau, or as a compound word. This
term includes all of the following:
a. A common name for the species of the poultry subject to slaughter and
processing, including chicken, poultry, or turkey.
b. A common name for a characteristic of a species of the poultry subject
to slaughter and processing based on age, breed, or sex.
c. Meat, broiler, fryer, poulet, or yearling.
d. A common name used to describe a major cut of poultry slaughtered
and processed, including a poultry product such as breast, drumstick,
House Bill 134-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
giblet, thigh, or wing; or the common name of an organ or offal,
including gizzard, heart, liver, kidney, or tongue.
e. Any other common name that a reasonable purchaser would
immediately and exclusively associate with a poultry product prepared
for sale in normal commercial channels.
…
(11a) "Insect-protein food product" means a food product having one or more
sensory attributes that resemble a type of tissue originating from poultry but
that, in lieu of being derived from meat processing, is derived from
manufacturing insect parts.
…
(16a) "Manufactured-protein food product" means a cell-cultured food product,
insect-protein food product, or plant-protein food product.
(17) "Misbranded" shall apply to any poultry product under one or more of the
following circumstances:
a. If its labeling is false or misleading in any particular;
b. If it is offered for sale under the name of another food;
c. If it is an imitation of another food, unless its label bears, in type of
uniform size and prominence, the word "imitation" and immediately
thereafter, the name of the food imitated;
…
m. If it is a manufactured-protein food product and it is not labeled in
accordance with G.S. 106-549.55(e).
…
(24a) "Plant-protein food product" means a food product having one or more
sensory attributes that resemble a type of tissue originating from poultry but
that, in lieu of being derived from meat processing, is derived from
manufacturing plant or fungus parts.
…
(26) "Poultry product" means any poultry carcass, or part thereof; or any product
which is made wholly or in part from any poultry carcass or part thereof, or
any cell-cultured food product made from cells of poultry, excepting products
which contain poultry ingredients only in a relatively small proportion or
historically have not been considered by consumers as products of the poultry
food industry, and which are exempted by the Board from definition as a
poultry product under such conditions as the Board may prescribe to assure
that the poultry ingredients in such products are not adulterated and that such
products are not represented as poultry products.
…
(28a) "Qualifying term" means a word, compound word, or phrase that would
clearly disclose to a reasonable purchaser of poultry products that a food
product is not a poultry product. This includes the following terms:
"cell-cultured," "fake," "grown in a lab," "insect," "insect-based,"
"insect-protein," "lab-created," "lab-grown," "meat free," "meatless," "plant,"
"plant-based," "vegan," "vegetable," "vegetarian," or "veggie."
…."
SECTION 2.(b) G.S. 106-549.55 reads as rewritten:
"§ 106-549.55. Labeling standards; false and misleading labels.labels; labeling of
manufactured-protein food products.
…
Page 4 House Bill 134-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(e) The label of any manufactured-protein food product that contains an identifying
poultry term shall also contain in at least 20-point font or the size of the surrounding type,
whichever is greater, and in close proximity to the name of the product, an appropriate qualifying
term."
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective October 1, 2025, and applies to products
sold or offered for sale on or after that date.
House Bill 134-First Edition Page 5